Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Shares

48-16-101. Authorized shares.

The charter must prescribe the number of shares of each class that the corporation is authorized to issue. If more than one (1) class of shares is authorized, the charter must prescribe a distinguishing designation for each class, and prior to the issuance of shares of a class, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights of that class must be described in the charter. All shares of a class must have preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same class except to the extent otherwise permitted by § 48-16-102.

The charter must authorize:

One (1) or more classes of shares that together have unlimited voting rights; and

One (1) or more classes of shares (which may be the same class or classes as those with voting rights) that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution.

The charter may authorize one (1) or more classes of shares that:

Have special, conditional, or limited voting rights, or no right to vote, except to the extent prohibited by chapters 11-27 of this title;

Are redeemable or convertible as specified in the charter:

At the option of the corporation, the shareholder, or another person or upon the occurrence of a designated event;

For cash, indebtedness, securities, or other property;

In a designated amount or in an amount determined in accordance with a designated formula or by reference to extrinsic data or events;

Entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative, or partially cumulative;

Have preference over any other class of shares with respect to distributions, including dividends and distributions upon the dissolution of the corporation; or

Have a par value; provided, that the mere recitation of a par value for shares shall not create a requirement for a minimum consideration for the issuance of any such shares or impose any other restriction on their issuance or create any other right or liability with respect thereto.

The description of the designations, preferences, limitations, and relative rights of share classes in subsection (c) is not exhaustive.

Any of the voting rights, preferences, limitations and relative rights of any class or series of shares authorized under this section may be made dependent upon facts ascertainable outside the charter; provided, that the manner in which such facts shall operate upon the voting powers, preferences, limitations and relative rights is set forth in reasonable detail in the charter.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.01; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 10-13.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Nonprofit corporations, distributions, title 48, ch. 63.

Law Reviews.

Shareholder Oppression in Close Corporations: The Unanswered Question on Perspective, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

48-16-102. Terms of class or series determined by board of directors.

If the charter so provides, the board of directors may determine, in whole or part, the preferences, limitations, and relative rights (within the limits set forth in § 48-16-101) of:

Any class of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class; or

One (1) or more series within a class before the issuance of any shares of that series.

Each series of a class must be given a distinguishing designation.

All shares of a series must have preferences, limitations, and relative rights identical with those of other shares of the same series and, except to the extent otherwise provided in the description of the series, with those of other series of the same class.

Before issuing any shares of a class or series created under this section, the corporation must deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment, which are effective without shareholder action, that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of the amendment determining the terms of the class or series of shares;

The date it was adopted; and

A statement that the amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.02.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 88.

48-16-103. Issued and outstanding shares.

A corporation may issue the number of shares of each class or series authorized by the charter. Shares that are issued are outstanding shares until they are reacquired, redeemed, converted, or cancelled.

The reacquisition, redemption, or conversion of outstanding shares is subject to the limitation of subsection (c) and to § 48-16-401.

At all times that shares of the corporation are outstanding, one (1) or more shares that together have unlimited voting rights and one (1) or more shares that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution must be outstanding.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.03.

48-16-104. Fractional shares.

A corporation may:

Issue fractions of a share or pay in money the value of fractions of a share;

Arrange for disposition of fractional shares by the shareholders; and

Issue scrip in registered or bearer form entitling the holder to receive a full share upon surrendering enough scrip to equal a full share.

Each certificate representing scrip must be conspicuously labeled “scrip” and must contain the information required by § 48-16-206(b).

The holder of a fractional share is entitled to exercise the rights of a shareholder, including the right to vote, to receive dividends, and to participate in the assets of the corporation upon liquidation. The holder of scrip is not entitled to any of these rights unless the scrip provides for them.

The board of directors may authorize the issuance of scrip, subject to any condition considered desirable, including that:

The scrip will become void if not exchanged for full shares before a specified date; and

The shares for which the scrip is exchangeable may be sold and the proceeds paid to the scripholders.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 6.04.